North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 2. Local Administration.
§ 130A-45.3.
Powers and duties of authority board.

A public health authority shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this Part, including the following powers to:

Protect and promote the public health. The board shall have the authority to adopt rules necessary for that purpose.

Construct, equip, operate, and maintain public health facilities.

Use property owned or controlled by the authority.

Acquire real or personal property, including existing public health facilities, by purchase, grant, gift, devise, lease or, with the permission of the county commissioners, condemnation.

Establish a fee schedule for services received from public health facilities and make services available regardless of ability to pay.

Appoint a public health authority director to serve at the pleasure of the authority board.

Establish a salary plan which shall set the salaries for employees of the area authority.

To adopt and enforce a professional reimbursement policy which may include the following provisions: (i) require that fees for the provision of services received directly under the supervision of the public health authority shall be paid to the authority,
(ii) prohibit employees of the public health authority from providing services on a private basis which require the use of the resources and facilities of the public health authority, and (iii) provide that employees may
not accept dual compensation and dual employment unless they have the written permission of the public health authority director.

Delegate to its agents or employees any powers or duties as it may deem appropriate.

Employ its own counsel and legal staff.

Adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws for the conduct of its business.

Enter into contracts for necessary supplies, equipment, or services for the operation of its business.

Act as an agent for the federal, State, or local government in connection with the acquisition, construction, operation, or management of a public health facility, or any part thereof.

Insure the property or the operations of the authority against risks as the authority may deem advisable.

Sue and be sued.

Accept donations or money, personal property, or real estate for the benefit of the authority and to take title to the same from any person, firm, corporation, or society.

Appoint advisory boards, committees, and councils composed of qualified and interested residents of the authority service area to study, interpret, and advise the public health authority board.

To purchase or finance real or personal property in the manner provided for cities and counties under

G.S. 160A-20

.

A public health authority shall have the power to establish and operate health care networks and may contract with or enter into any arrangement with other public health authorities or local health departments of this or other states, federal, or other
public agencies, or with any person, private organization, or nonprofit corporation or association for the provision of public health services, including managed health care activities; provided, however, that for the purposes
of this subsection only, a public health authority shall be permitted to and shall comply with the requirements of Article 67 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes to the extent that such requirements apply to the activities undertaken
by the public health authority pursuant to this subsection. The public health authority may pay for or contribute its share of the cost of any such contract or arrangement from revenues available for these purposes, including revenues
arising from the provision of public health services.

A public health authority may lease any public health facility, or part, to a nonprofit association on terms and conditions consistent with the purposes of this Part. The authority will determine the length of the lease. No lease executed under this subsection
shall be deemed to convey a freehold interest.

A public health authority shall neither sell nor convey any rights of ownership the county has in any public health facility, including the buildings, land, and equipment associated with the facility, to any corporation or other business entity operated
for profit, except that nothing herein shall prohibit the sale of surplus buildings, surplus land, or surplus equipment by an authority to any corporation or other business entity operated for profit. For purposes of this subsection,
“surplus” means any building, land, or equipment which is not required for use in the delivery of public health care services by a public health facility at the time of the sale or conveyance of ownership rights.

A public health authority may lease any public health facility, or part, to any corporation, foreign or domestic, authorized to do business in North Carolina on terms and conditions consistent with the purposes of this Part and with

G.S. 160A-272

.

A public health authority may exercise any or all of the powers conferred upon it by this Part, either generally or with respect to any specific public health facility or facilities, through or by designated agents, including any corporation or corporations
which are or shall be formed under the laws of this State.

An authority may contract to insure itself and any of its board members, agents, or employees against liability for wrongful death or negligent or intentional damage to person or property or against absolute liability for damage to person or property
caused by an act or omission of the authority or of any of its board members, agents, or employees when acting within the scope of their authority and the course of their employment. The board shall determine what liabilities and
what members, agents, and employees shall be covered by any insurance purchased pursuant to this subsection.Purchase of insurance pursuant to this subsection waives the authority’s governmental immunity, to the extent of insurance
coverage, for any act or omission occurring in the exercise of a governmental function. Participation in a local government risk pool pursuant to Article 23 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes shall be deemed to be the purchase
of insurance for the purposes of this section. By entering into an insurance contract with the authority, an insurer waives any defense based upon the governmental immunity of the authority.

If an authority has waived its governmental immunity pursuant to subsection (g) of this section, any person, or in the event of death, their personal representative, sustaining damages as a result of an act or omission of the authority or any of its board
members, agents, or employees, occurring in the exercise of a governmental function, may sue the authority for recovery of damages. To the extent of the coverage of insurance purchased pursuant to subsection (g) of this section,
governmental immunity may not be a defense to the action. Otherwise, however, the authority has all defenses available to private litigants in any action brought pursuant to this section without restriction, limitation, or other
effect, whether the defense arises from common law or by virtue of a statute.Despite the purchase of insurance as authorized by subsection (g) of this section, the liability of an authority for acts or omissions occurring in the
exercise of governmental functions does not attach unless the plaintiff waives the right to have all issues of law or fact relating to insurance in the action determined by a jury. The judge shall hear and determine these issues
without resort to a jury, and the jury shall be absent during any motion, argument, testimony, or announcement of findings of fact or conclusions of law relating to these issues unless the defendant requests a jury trial on them.

History.
1997-502, s. 1; 2007-229, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-229, s. 2, effective July 18, 2007, added subdivision (a)(18).

§ 130A-45.4.
Appointment of a public health authority director.

A public health authority board, after consulting with the appropriate county board or boards of commissioners, shall appoint a public health authority director.

All persons who are appointed to the position of public health authority director must possess minimum education and experience requirements for that position, as follows:

A medical doctorate; or

A masters degree in Public Health Administration, and at least one year of employment experience in health programs or health services; or

A masters degree in a public health discipline other than public health administration, and at least three years of employment experience in health programs or health services; or

A masters degree in public administration, and at least two years of experience in health programs or health services; or

A masters degree in a field related to public health, and at least three years of experience in health programs or health services; or

A bachelors degree in public health administration or public administration and at least three years of experience in health programs or health services.

Before appointing a person to the position of public health authority director under subdivision (a)(5) of this section, the authority board shall forward the application and other pertinent materials of such candidate to the State Health Director. If
the State Health Director determines that the candidate’s masters degree is in a field not related to public health, the State Health Director shall so notify the authority board in writing within 15 days of the State Health Director’s
receipt of the application and materials, and such candidate shall be deemed not to meet the education requirements of subdivision (a)(5) of this section. If the State Health Director fails to act upon the application within 15
days of receipt of the application and materials from the authority board, the application shall be deemed approved with respect to the education requirements of subdivision (a)(5) of this section, and the authority board may proceed
with the appointment process.

The State Health Director shall review requests of educational institutions to determine whether a particular masters degree offered by the requesting institution is related to public health for the purposes of subdivision (a)(5) of this section. The
State Health Director shall act upon such requests within 90 days of receipt of the request and pertinent materials from the institution, and shall notify the institution of its determination in writing within the 90-day review
period. If the State Health Director determines that an institution’s particular masters degree is not related to public health, the State Health Director shall include the reasons therefor in his written determination to the institution.

When an authority board fails to appoint a public health authority director within 60 days of the creation of a vacancy, the State Health Director may appoint an authority director to serve until the authority board appoints an authority director in accordance
with this section.

History.
1997-502, s. 1.

§ 130A-45.5.
Powers and duties of a public health authority director.

The public health authority director is an employee of the authority board and shall serve at the pleasure of the authority board.

An authority health director shall perform public health duties prescribed by and under the supervision of the public health authority board and the Department and shall be employed full time in the field of public health.

An authority health director shall have the following powers and duties:

To administer programs as directed by the public health authority board;

To enforce the rules of the public health authority board;

To investigate the causes of infectious, communicable, and other diseases;

To exercise quarantine authority and isolation authority pursuant to

G.S. 130A-145

;

To disseminate public health information and to promote the benefits of good health;

To advise local officials concerning public health matters;

To enforce the immunization requirements of Part 2 of Article 7 of this Chapter;

To examine and investigate cases of venereal disease pursuant to Parts 3 and 4 of Article 6 of this Chapter;

To examine and investigate cases of tuberculosis pursuant to Part 5 of Article 6 of this Chapter;

To examine, investigate, and control rabies pursuant to Part 6 of Article 6 of this Chapter;

To abate public health nuisances and imminent hazards pursuant to

G.S. 130A-19

and

G.S. 130A-20

; and

To employ, discipline, and dismiss employees of the public health authority.

Authority conferred upon a public health authority director may be exercised only within the county or counties comprising the public health authority.

History.
1997-502, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Physicians’ Elusive Public Health Duties,” see 99 N.C.L. Rev. 923 (2021).

§ 130A-45.6.
Boundaries of the authority.

A public health authority may provide or contract to provide public health services and to acquire, construct, establish, enlarge, improve, maintain, own, or operate, and contract for the operation of any public health facilities outside the territorial
limits, within reasonable limitation, of the county or counties creating the authority, but in no case shall a public health authority be held liable for damages to those outside the territorial limits of the county or counties creating
the authority for failure to provide any public health service.

History.
1997-502, s. 1.

§ 130A-45.7.
Medical review committee.

A member of a duly appointed medical review committee who acts without malice or fraud shall not be subject to liability for damages in any civil action on account of any act, statement, or proceeding undertaken, made, or performed within the scope of
the functions of the committee.

The proceedings of a medical review committee, the records and materials it produces and the materials it considers shall be confidential and not considered public records within the meaning of

G.S. 132-1

, “ ‘Public records’ defined”, and shall not be subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action against a public health authority or a provider of professional health services which results
from matters which are the subject of evaluation and review by the committee. No person who was in attendance at a meeting of the committee shall be required to testify in any civil action as to any evidence or other matters produced
or presented during the proceedings of the committee or as to any findings, recommendations, evaluations, opinions, or other actions of the committee or its members. However, information, documents, or records otherwise available
are not immune from discovery or use in a civil action merely because they were presented during proceedings of the committee. A member of the committee or a person who testifies before the committee may testify in a civil action
but cannot be asked about his testimony before the committee or any opinions formed as a result of the committee hearings.

History.
1997-502, s. 1.

§ 130A-45.8.
Confidentiality of patient information.

Medical records compiled and maintained by public health authorities in connection with the admission, treatment, and discharge of individual patients are not public records as defined by Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

Charges, accounts, credit histories, and other personal financial records compiled and maintained by public health authorities in connection with the admission, treatment, and discharge of individual patients are not public records as defined by Chapter
132 of the General Statutes.

History.
1997-502, s. 1.

§ 130A-45.9.
Confidentiality of personnel information.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the personnel files of employees or former employees and the files of applicants for employment maintained by a public health authority are not public records as defined by Chapter 132 of the General
Statutes.

The following information with respect to each employee of a public health authority is a matter of public record: name; age; date of original employment or appointment; beginning and ending dates, position title, position descriptions, and total compensation
of current and former positions; the terms of any contract by which the employee is employed whether written or oral, past and current, to the extent that the authority has the written contract or a record of the oral contract
in its possession, and date of the most recent promotion, demotion, transfer, suspension, separation, or other change in position classification. In addition, the following information with respect to each licensed medical provider
employed by or having privileges to practice in a public health facility shall be a matter of public record: educational history and qualifications, date and jurisdiction or original and current licensure; and information relating
to medical board certifications or other qualifications of medical specialists. For the purposes of this subsection, the term “total compensation” includes pay, benefits, incentives, bonuses, and deferred and all other forms of
compensation paid by the employing entity.

Information regarding the qualifications, competence, performance, character, fitness, or conditions of appointment of an independent contractor who provides health care services under a contract with a public health authority is not a public record as
defined by Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. Information regarding a hearing or investigation of a complaint, charge, or grievance by or against an independent contractor who provides health care services under a contract with
a public health authority is not a public record as defined by Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. Final action making an appointment or discharge or removal by a public health authority having final authority for the appointment
or discharge or removal shall be taken in an open meeting, unless otherwise exempted by law. The following information with respect to each independent contractor of health care services of a public health authority is a matter
of public record: name; age; date of original contract; beginning and ending dates; position title; position descriptions; and total compensation of current and former positions; and the date of the most recent promotion, demotion,
transfer, suspension, separation, or other change in position classification.

History.
1997-502, s. 1; 2007-508, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-508, s. 5, effective August 30, 2007, in subsection (b), inserted “the terms of any contract by which the employee is employed whether written or oral, past and current, to the extent that the authority has the written contract or a
record of the oral contract in its possession” in the first sentence, and added the last sentence.

§ 130A-45.10.
Confidentiality of credentialing information.

Information acquired by a public health authority or by persons acting for or on behalf of a public health authority in connection with the credentialing and peer review of persons having or applying for privileges to practice in a public health facility
is confidential and is not a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes; provided that information otherwise available to the public shall not become confidential merely because it was acquired by the authority or by persons
acting for or on behalf of the authority.

History.
1997-502, s. 1.

§ 130A-45.11.
Confidentiality of competitive health care information.

Information relating to competitive health care activities by or on behalf of public health authorities shall be confidential and not a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes; provided that any contract entered into by or on behalf of
a public health authority shall be a public record unless otherwise exempted by law.

History.
1997-502, s. 1.

§ 130A-45.12.
Personnel.

Employees under the supervision of the public health authority director are employees of the public health authority and shall be exempt from Chapter 126 of the General Statutes, unless otherwise provided in this Part.

History.
2001-92, s. 1.

§ 130A-45.13.
Authority to contract directly with private providers to operate billing system for county Medicaid claims.

A public health authority board may contract directly with private vendors to operate the authority’s Medicaid billing system as an alternative to the State-operated health services information system. The contract may provide for the private vendor to
bill directly the State Medicaid billing system (MMIS), thereby bypassing the State health services information system (HSIS). The public health authority shall issue a “request for proposal” to solicit private vendor bids for contracts
authorized under this section. Information systems authorized under this section shall be consistent with and interface with relevant statewide public health data systems to address State cost containment and service reporting needs.

History.
2005-459, s. 1.

§ 130A-46.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2. Sanitary Districts.

§ 130A-47.
Creation by Commission.

For the purpose of preserving and promoting the public health and welfare, the Commission may create sanitary districts without regard for county, township or municipal lines. However, no municipal corporation or any part of the territory in a municipal
corporation shall be included in a sanitary district except at the request of the governing board of the municipal corporation. If the municipal corporation has not levied any tax nor performed any official act nor held any elections
within a period of four years preceding the date of the petition for the sanitary district, a request of the governing board shall not be required.

For the purposes of this Part, the term “Department” means the Department of Environmental Quality, and the term “Secretary” means the Secretary of Environmental Quality.

History.
1927, c. 100, s. 1; 1955, c. 1307; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2007-187, s. 1; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), (v).

Local Modification to Former Similar Provisions.

Caswell: 1939, c. 3, ss. 1, 2; 1941, c. 89; 1943, c. 287; Moore: 1939, c. 3, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-187, s. 1, effective July 8, 2007, added the subsection (a) designation to the previously existing provisions; and added subsection (b).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), (v), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” and “Secretary of Environmental Quality” for “Secretary of Environment and Natural
Resources” in subsection (b).

§ 130A-48.
Procedure for incorporating district.

A sanitary district shall be incorporated as follows. Either fifty-one percent (51%) or more of the resident freeholders within a proposed sanitary district or fifty-one percent (51%) or more of the freeholders within a proposed sanitary district, whether
or not the freeholders are residents of the proposed sanitary district, may petition the county board of commissioners of the county in which all or the largest portion of the land of the proposed district is located. This petition
shall set forth the boundaries of the proposed sanitary district and the objectives of the proposed district. For the purposes of this Part, the term “freeholder” shall mean a person holding a deed to a tract of land within the district
or proposed district, and also shall mean a person who has entered into a contract to purchase a tract of land within the district or proposed district, is making payments pursuant to a contract and will receive a deed upon completion
of the contractual payments. The contracting purchaser, rather than the contracting seller, shall be deemed to be the freeholder. The county tax office shall be responsible for checking the freeholder status of those persons signing
the petition. That office shall also be responsible for confirming the location of the property owned by those persons. Upon receipt of the petition, the county board of commissioners, through its chairperson, shall notify the Department
and the chairperson of the county board of commissioners of any other county or counties in which any portion of the proposed district lies of the receipt of the petition. The chairperson shall request that the Department hold a joint
public hearing with the county commissioners of all the counties in which a portion of the district lies concerning the creation of the proposed sanitary district. The Secretary and the chairperson of the county board of commissioners
shall name a time and place within the proposed district to hold the public hearing. The chairperson of the county board of commissioners shall give prior notice of the hearing by posting a notice at the courthouse door of the county
and also by publication at least once a week for four successive weeks in a newspaper published in the county. In the event the hearing is to be before a joint meeting of the county boards of commissioners of more than one county,
or in the event the land to be affected lies in more than one county, publication and notice shall be made in each of the affected counties. In the event that all matters pertaining to the creation of this sanitary district cannot
be concluded at the hearing, the hearing may be continued at a time and place within the proposed district named by the Department.

History.
1927, c. 100, ss. 2-4; 1951, c. 178, s. 1; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1959, c. 1189, s. 1; 1965, c. 135; 1967, c. 24, s. 21; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1975, c. 536; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 2002-159, s. 55(f).

Local Modification to Former G.S. 130-124.

Guilford: 1973, c. 263.

§ 130A-49.
Declaration that district exists; status of industrial villages within boundaries of district.

If, after the required public hearing, the Commission and the county commissioners determine that a district shall be created for the purposes stated in the petition, the Commission shall adopt a resolution defining the boundaries of the district and
declaring the territory within the boundaries to be a sanitary district. The Commission may make minor deviation in defining the boundaries from those prescribed in the petition when it determines the change to be in the interest
of the public health.

The owner or controller of an industrial plant may make application requesting that the plant or the plant and its contiguous village be included within or excluded from the sanitary district. The application shall be filed with the Commission on or before
the date of the public hearing. If an application is properly filed, the Commission shall include or exclude the industrial plant and contiguous village in accordance with the application.

Each district when created shall be identified by a name or number assigned by the Commission.

History.
1927, c. 100, s. 5; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1983, c. 891, s. 2.

§ 130A-49.5.
Ethics.

The governing board shall adopt a resolution or policy containing a code of ethics, as required by

G.S. 160A-86

.

All members of the governing board, whether elected or appointed, shall receive the ethics education required by

G.S. 160A-87

.

History.
2009-403, s. 6.

§ 130A-50.
Election and terms of office of sanitary district boards.

The Department shall send a copy of the resolution creating the sanitary district to the board or boards of county commissioners of the county or counties in which all or part of the district is located. The Department shall file or cause to be filed
with the county board or boards of elections in the same county or counties a map of the district. With the map it shall include supporting documents. That map and documents shall be filed within 10 business days after the creation
of the district and amended within 10 days after any change to the boundaries of the district. The board or boards of commissioners shall hold a meeting or joint meeting for the purpose of electing the members of the sanitary district
board.

The sanitary district board shall be composed of either three or five members as the county commissioners in their discretion shall determine. The members first appointed shall serve as the governing body of the sanitary district until the next regular
election for municipal and special district officers as provided in

G.S. 163-279

, which occurs more than 90 days after their appointment. At that election, their successors shall be elected. The terms of the members shall be for two years or four years and may be staggered as determined by the
county board of commissioners so that some members are elected at each biennial election. The members of the sanitary district board shall be residents of the district. The county board of commissioners shall notify the county
board of elections of any decision made under this subsection.If the sanitary district board consists of three members, the county commissioners may at any time increase the sanitary district board to five members. The increase
shall become effective with respect to any election where the filing period for candidacy opens at least 30 days after approval of the expansion to five members. The effective date of the expansion is the organizational meeting
of the sanitary district board after the election.The county commissioners may provide for staggering terms of an existing sanitary district board whose members serve two-year terms by providing for some of the members to be elected
at the next election to be for four-year terms. The change shall become effective with respect to any election where the filing period for candidacy opens at least 30 days after approval of the staggering of terms.The sanitary
district board may provide for staggering its terms if its members serve unstaggered four-year terms by providing for some of the members to be elected at the next election for two-year terms. The change shall become effective
with respect to any election where the filing period for candidacy opens at least 30 days after approval of the staggering of terms.The county commissioners may provide for changing a sanitary district board from two-year terms
to unstaggered four-year terms. This may be done either by providing that at the next election, all members shall be elected for four-year terms, or by extending the terms of existing members from two years to four years. The change
shall become effective with respect to any election where the filing period for candidacy opens at least 30 days after approval of the change of length of terms.

(b1) If a sanitary district:

Is located entirely within a county which has no incorporated city as defined by

G.S. 160A-1(2)

located within that county; and

Has a sanitary district board whose members serve four-year terms which are not staggered and which next expire in 1991,

the board of commissioners of that county may, by resolution adopted prior to December 31, 1989, set the sanitary district election to be held on the same date as general elections in even-numbered years under

G.S. 163-1

. Such resolution shall extend the terms of office of the then serving members of the sanitary district board by one year, so that they will expire on the first Monday in December following the 1992
general election. Other than as provided by this subsection, sanitary district elections shall continue to be conducted in accordance with this Article and Chapter 163 of the General Statutes.

The election shall be nonpartisan and decided by simple plurality as provided in

G.S. 163-292

and shall be held and conducted by the county board of elections in accordance with the applicable provisions of Articles 23 and 24 of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes. If the district is in more than one county,
then the county board of elections of the county including the largest part of the district shall conduct the election for the entire district with the assistance and full cooperation of the boards of elections in the other counties.

The board of elections shall certify the results of the election to the clerk of superior court. The clerk of superior court shall take and file the oaths of office of the board members elected.

The elected members of the board shall take the oath of office on the first Monday in December following their election and shall serve for the term elected and until their successors are elected and qualified.

Does not share territory with any city as defined by

G.S. 160A-1(2)

, and

The sanitary district is in more than one county,

the boards of county commissioners in all counties with territory in the sanitary district may set the sanitary district elections to be held on the same date as general elections in even-numbered years under

G.S. 163-1

and may extend the terms of any sanitary district board members who are in office at the ratification of this act until the next even-year general election can been [be] held and successors qualified.

(b2) If a sanitary district:

History.
1927, c. 100, s. 6; 1943, c. 602; 1953, c. 798; 1955, c. 1073; 1957, c. 1357, s. 1; 1963, c. 644; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1981, c. 186, s. 1; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 22, s. 1; 1989, c. 310; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c.
736, s. 1.1; 1997-117, s. 1; 2007-391, s. 15; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Harkers Island Sanitary District: 2011-128, s. 2.

Local Modification.

Local Modification to Former G.S. 130-126.

Alamance: 1955, c. 588; West Smithfield Sanitary District Board: 1973, c. 367.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter
163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws
relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines,
internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes made conforming changes to references throughout subsections (b), (b1),
(b2) and (c).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1 repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session
Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references throughout subsections (b), (b1), (b2) and (c).

§ 130A-51.
City governing body acting as sanitary district board.

When the General Assembly incorporates a city or town that includes within its territory fifty percent (50%) or more of the territory of a sanitary district, the governing body of the city or town shall become ex officio the governing board of the sanitary
district if the General Assembly provides for this action in the incorporation act and if the existing sanitary district board adopts a final resolution pursuant to this section. The resolution may be adopted at any time within
the period beginning on the day the incorporation act becomes law and ending 270 days after that date.

To begin the process leading to the city or town board becoming ex officio the sanitary district board, the board of the sanitary district shall first adopt a preliminary resolution finding that the interests of the citizens of the sanitary district and
of the city or town will be best served if both units of local government are governed by a single governing body. This resolution shall also set the time and place for a public hearing on the preliminary resolution.

Upon adoption of this preliminary resolution, the chairperson of the sanitary district board shall publish a notice of the public hearing once at least 10 days before the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation within the sanitary district. This
notice shall set forth the time and place of the hearing and shall briefly describe its purpose. At the hearing, the board shall hear any citizen of the sanitary district or of the city or town who wishes to speak to the subject
of the preliminary resolution.

Within 30 days after the day of the public hearing, the sanitary district board may adopt a final resolution finding that the interests of the citizens of the sanitary district and of the city or town will be best served if both units are governed by
a single board. This resolution shall set the date on which the terms of office of the members of the sanitary district board end and that board is dissolved and service by the ex officio board begins. This date may be the effective
date of the incorporation of the city or town or any date within one year after the effective date. At that time, the sanitary district board is dissolved and the mayor and members of the governing body of the city or town become
ex officio the board of the sanitary district. The mayor shall act ex officio as chairperson of the sanitary district board.

The chairperson of the sanitary district board that adopts a final resolution shall within 10 days after the day the resolution is adopted, send a copy of the resolution to the mayor and each member of the city or town governing board and to the Department.

History.
1981, c. 201; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1995, c. 20, s. 15.